Massachusetts, session 194th, H1970.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 20 of chapter 185C of the General Laws as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence:
Any such motion or notice to transfer the action to the housing court shall be filed with
the answer or within 90 days of service of process.
of 1